Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2726
Licensee; money transmission; duties.

(1) Every licensee shall forward all money received for transmission in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the licensee and the sender unless the licensee has a reasonable belief or a reasonable basis to believe that the sender may be a victim of fraud or that a crime or violation of any law, rule, or regulation has occurred, is occurring, or may occur.

(2) If a licensee does not forward money received for transmission in accordance with this section, the licensee shall respond to inquiries by the sender with the reason for not forwarding the money unless providing a response would violate a state or federal law, rule, or regulation.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 26;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 31.